Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 24 MISCELLANEOUS
§ 49-2447. Organ donation contribution fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the organ donation contribution fund, the moneys of which shall be continuously appropriated.

The Idaho transportation department through the division of motor vehicles shall:

Administer the moneys deposited in the organ donation contribution fund;

Distribute moneys in accordance with subsection (5) of this section;

Make an annual report to the house of representatives and senate health and welfare committees on revenue collected for the fund and contributions made to the fund; and

Promulgate rules for the distribution of moneys from the fund that are consistent with the purposes of this section.

The organ donation contribution fund shall consist of:

Private contributions;

Donations or grants from public or private entities;

Voluntary donations collected under sections 49-306(2) and 49-402(7), Idaho Code; and

Any other moneys approved for the fund by law.

Idle moneys in the fund shall be invested by the treasurer per section 67-1210, Idaho Code, and moneys earned from such investment shall be credited to the fund.

The moneys in the organ donation contribution fund shall be distributed to intermountain donor services located in Salt Lake City, Utah, and shall be used to assist in maintaining and operating a statewide organ donation registry and provide organ donor awareness education in Idaho.

§ 49-2448. Autocycles.

The following provisions of law shall apply to autocycles:

Motorcycle plate and registration tag requirements;

Motorcycle registration requirements. Certification from the national highway traffic safety administration and a manufacturer’s certificate of origin stating that the vehicle meets the federal specifications for a motorcycle shall be required for all autocycles prior to registration;

Motorcycle insurance requirements.

All persons operating autocycles shall be in compliance with the provisions of section 49-301, Idaho Code.

§ 49-2442. Identification cards authorized.